Hawaii statutes.
§235-16.5 Cesspool upgrade, conversion, or
connection; income tax credit. [Section repealed December 31, 2020. L
2015, c 120, §4.] (a) There shall be allowed to each taxpayer subject to
the tax imposed under this chapter, a cesspool upgrade, conversion, or
connection income tax credit that shall be deductible from the taxpayer's net
income tax liability, if any, imposed by this chapter for the taxable year in
which the credit is properly claimed.

(b) In the case of a partnership, S
corporation, estate, or trust, the tax credit allowable is for qualified
expenses incurred by the entity for the taxable year. The expenses upon which
the tax credit is computed shall be determined at the entity level.
Distribution and share of credit shall be determined by rule.

(c) The cesspool upgrade, conversion, or
connection income tax credit shall be equal to the qualified expenses of the
taxpayer, up to a maximum of $10,000; provided that, in the case of a qualified
cesspool that is a residential large capacity cesspool, the amount of the
credit shall be equal to the qualified expenses of the taxpayer, up to a
maximum of $10,000 per residential dwelling connected to the cesspool, as
certified by the department of health pursuant to subsection (e). There shall be
allowed a maximum of one cesspool upgrade, conversion, or connection income tax
credit per qualified cesspool or per tax map key number where more than one
residence is connected to a residential large-capacity cesspool. The cesspool
upgrade, conversion, or connection income tax credit shall be available only
for the taxable year in which the taxpayer's qualified expenses are certified
by the appropriate government agency.

(d) The total amount of tax credits allowed
under this section shall not exceed $5,000,000 for all taxpayers in any taxable
year; provided that any taxpayer who is not eligible to claim the credit in a
taxable year due to the $5,000,000 cap having been exceeded for that taxable
year shall be eligible to claim the credit in the subsequent taxable year.

(e) The department of health shall:

(1) Certify all qualified cesspools for the purposes
of this section; provided that, as a pilot program, the department of health,
in its discretion, may certify no more than two residential large capacity
cesspools as qualified cesspools;

(2) Collect and maintain a record of all qualified
expenses certified by an appropriate government agency for the taxable year;
and

(3) Certify to each taxpayer the amount of credit the
taxpayer may claim; provided that if, in any year, the annual amount of certified
credits reaches $5,000,000 in the aggregate, the department of health shall
immediately discontinue certifying credits and notify the department of
taxation.

The director of health may adopt rules under chapter
91 as necessary to implement the certification requirements under this section.

(f) The director of taxation:

(1) Shall prepare any forms that may be necessary to
claim a tax credit under this section;

(2) May require the taxpayer to furnish reasonable
information to ascertain the validity of the claim for the tax credit made
under this section; and

(3) May adopt rules under chapter 91 necessary to
effectuate the purposes of this section.

(g) If the tax credit under this section
exceeds the taxpayer's income tax liability, the excess of the credit over
liability may be used as a credit against the taxpayer's income tax liability
in subsequent years until exhausted. All claims for the tax credit under this
section, including amended claims, shall be filed on or before the end of the
twelfth month following the close of the taxable year for which the credit may
be claimed. Failure to comply with the foregoing provision shall constitute a
waiver of the right to claim the credit.

(h) This section shall not apply to taxable
years beginning after December 31, 2020.

(i) As used in this section:

"Aerobic treatment unit system" means
an individual wastewater system that consists of an aerobic treatment unit
tank, aeration device, piping, and a discharge method that is in accordance
with rules adopted by the department of health relating to household aerobic
units.

"Cesspool" means an individual
wastewater system consisting of an excavation in the ground whose depth is
greater than its widest surface dimension, which receives untreated wastewater,
and retains or is designed to retain the organic matter and solids discharged
into it, but permits the liquid to seep through its bottom or sides to gain
access to the underground geographic formation.

"Qualified cesspool" means a cesspool
that is certified by the department of health as being:

(1) Located within:

(A) Two hundred feet of a shoreline,
perennial stream, or wetland; or

(B) A source water assessment program area
(two year time of travel from a cesspool to a public drinking water source); or

(2) A residential large capacity cesspool.

"Qualified expenses" means costs that
are necessary and directly incurred by the taxpayer for upgrading or converting
a qualified cesspool into a septic system or an aerobic treatment unit system,
or connecting a qualified cesspool to a sewer system, and that are certified as
such by the appropriate government agency.

"Residential large capacity cesspool"
means a cesspool that is connected to more than one residential dwelling.

"Septic system" means an individual
wastewater system that typically consists of a septic tank, piping, and a
drainage field where there is natural biological decontamination as wastewater
discharged into the system is filtered through soil.

"Sewer system" means a system of
piping, with appurtenances, for collecting and conveying wastewater from source
to discharge following treatment.

"Wastewater" means any liquid waste,
whether or not treated and whether animal, mineral, or vegetable, including
agricultural, industrial, and thermal wastes. [L 2015, c 120, §2; am L 2016, c
182, §1]

Note

The 2016 amendment applies to taxable years beginning after
December 31, 2015. L 2016, c 182, §3.

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next